Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.310

Headquarters office—Official records—Transfers of records.

The educational service district board shall designate the headquarters office of the educational service district. Educational service districts shall provide for their own office space, heating, contents insurance, electricity, and custodial services, which may be obtained through contracting with any board of county commissioners. Official records of the educational service district board and superintendent, including each of the county superintendents abolished by chapter 176, Laws of 1969 ex. sess., shall be kept by the educational service district superintendent. Whenever the boundaries of any of the educational service districts are reorganized pursuant to RCW 28A.310.020, the superintendent of public instruction shall supervise the transferral of such records so that each educational service district superintendent shall receive those records relating to school districts within the appropriate educational service district.

[ 2006 c 263 s 611; 1990 c 33 s 284; 1985 c 341 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 28; 1974 ex.s. c 75 s 17; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 18; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.21.120, 28.19.555.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 75: See note following RCW 28A.310.030.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.